Maryland, session 2025, HB0584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) The State Retirement Agency shall convene a workgroup of interested
stakeholders to study the requirements and processes for transfers of member service
between State and local retirement and pension systems and make recommendations to
improve the process of transfers between systems.
(2) The workgroup convened under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
include:
(i) one or more representatives of the State Retirement Agency,
designated by the Executive Director of the State Retirement Agency;
(ii) 1. one representative of the Baltimore City Employees’
Retirement System or the Baltimore City Fire and Police Employees’ Retirement System;
2. one representative of the Baltimore County Employees
Retirement System; and
3. one representative of the Howard County Retirement Plan
or the Howard County Police and Fire Employees’ Retirement Plan;
4. one representative of the Anne Arundel County
Government Employees’ Retirement Plan, the Anne Arundel County Fire Service
Retirement Plan, the Anne Arundel County Detention Officers’ and Deputy Sheriffs’
Retirement Plan, or the Anne Arundel County Police Service Retirement Plan; and
5. one representative of the Frederick County Employees
Retirement Plan;
(iii) one representative from the American Federation of State,
County, and Municipal Employees; and
– 1 –

Ch. 769 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) one or more representatives of the Department of Legislative
Services, designated by the Executive Director of the Department of Legislative Services.
(3) The representatives serving under paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection
shall be appointed by the Maryland Association of Counties.
(b) The workgroup shall:
(1) review federal and State requirements pertaining to transfers of service
credit between systems;
(2) review Title 37 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article for statutory
inconsistencies and duplicative or ambiguous provisions;
(3) examine any other issues related to transfers of member service
between State and local retirement and pension systems; and
(4) recommend legislative changes required to address statutory
inconsistencies and duplicative or ambiguous provisions within Title 37 of the State
Personnel and Pensions Article, and any other issues identified by the workgroup.
(c) The State Retirement Agency shall provide staff for the workgroup.
(d) On or before December 1, 2025, the State Retirement Agency shall submit a
report of the findings and recommendations of the workgroup, including the need for any
legislative initiatives, to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2026, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –